src/fst/stems/prepositions.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! Prepositions
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PrepRoot

cem:cem Prep  ; ! lm="cem" :: "near to"
ba:ba Prep  ; ! lm="ba" :: "near to"
ji:ji Prep ; ! lm="ji" :: "from"
ber:ber Prep  ; ! lm="ber" :: "in front of"
berî:berî Prep  ; ! lm="berî" :: "before"
derveyî:derveyî Prep ; ! lm="berî" :: "outside of"
piştî:piştî Prep ; ! lm="piştî" :: "after"
ser:ser Prep ; ! lm="ser" :: "on"
ta:ta Prep ; ! lm="ta" :: "until"
tevî:tevî Prep ; ! lm="tevî" :: "along with"

LEXICON Prep

+Pr: # ;
